Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Incorporation

7-53-201. Application for incorporation — Qualifications of applicants — Certificate.

Whenever any number of natural persons, not less than three (3), each of whom shall be a duly qualified elector of and taxpayer in the municipality, files with the governing body of the municipality an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of an industrial development board or corporation of such municipality, the governing body shall proceed to consider such application. If the governing body, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the corporation be formed and authorizes the persons making such application to proceed to form such corporation and approves the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the corporation, then the persons making such application shall execute, acknowledge and file a certificate of incorporation for the corporation provided in this part. No corporation may be formed unless such application shall have first been filed with the governing body of the municipality and the governing body shall have adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-2803.

Cross-References. Joint action to form industrial development corporations by eligible municipalities, §7-53-104.

Attorney General Opinions. Persons qualified to petition for the establishment of industrial development board, OAG 99-142, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 166 (7/27/99).

7-53-202. Requisites of certificate of incorporation — Acknowledgment.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The names and residences of the applicants, together with a recital that each of them is an elector of and taxpayer in the municipality;

The name of the corporation, which shall be The Industrial Development Board of the of , the blank spaces to be filled in with the name of the municipality, including the proper designation of the municipality as a city or town, if such name shall be available for use by the corporation and, if not available, then the incorporators shall designate some other similar name that is available;

A recital that permission to organize the corporation had been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of such resolution;

The location of the principal office of the corporation, which shall be in the municipality;

The purposes for which the corporation is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the corporation;

The period, if any, for the duration of the corporation; and

Any other matter the applicants may choose to insert in the certificate of incorporation, which shall not be inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of the state of Tennessee.

The certificate of incorporation shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each of the applicants before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-2804.

7-53-203. Approval of certificate by secretary of state — Recording.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with §7-53-202, the certificate of incorporation shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall then examine the certificate of incorporation and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained in the certificate are correct, that there has been compliance with the requirements of §7-53-202, the secretary of state shall approve the certificate of incorporation and record it in an appropriate book or record in the secretary of state's office. When such certificate has been so made, filed and approved, the applicants shall constitute a public corporation under the name set out in the certificate of incorporation.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-2805; Acts 1995, ch. 364, § 2.

7-53-204. Amendment of certificate.

The certificate of incorporation may at any time and from time to time be amended so as to make any changes in the certificate of incorporation and add any provisions to the certificate of incorporation that might have been included in the certificate of incorporation in the first instance. Any such amendment shall be effected in the following manner: the members of the board of directors of the corporation shall file with the governing body of the municipality an application in writing seeking permission to amend the certificate of incorporation, specifying in such application the amendment proposed to be made. Such governing body shall consider such application and, if it shall by appropriate resolution duly find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and shall authorize the same to be made, and shall approve the form of the proposed amendment, then the persons making such application shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in such application, and shall file the instrument with the secretary of state. The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each member of the board of directors before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds. The secretary of state shall then examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that there has been compliance with the requirements of this section and the proposed amendment is within the scope of what might be included in an original certificate of incorporation, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office. When such amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall then become effective and the certificate of incorporation shall then be amended to the extent provided in the amendment. No certificate of incorporation shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-2806.